Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2502
Commission; purpose.

The purpose of the commission shall be to join representatives of all Indians in Nebraska to do all things which it may determine to enhance the cause of Indian rights and to develop solutions to problems common to all Nebraska Indians.

Laws 1971, LB 904, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 81-1215.